North Carolina statutes. Chapter 150A. Administrative Procedure Act. [Repealed]
§§ 150A-1 through 150A-64.
[Repealed]

Recodified as §§ 150B-1 to 150B-64, effective January 1, 1986.

Editor’s Note.

This Chapter was rewritten by Session Laws 1985, c. 746, s. 1, effective January 1, 1986, and has been recodified as Chapter 150B.

Session Laws 1985, c. 746, s. 19 had provided that the act would expire January 1, 1992, and would not be effective on or after that date, but the expiration date was deleted by Session Laws 1991, c. 103, ss. 1 and 2 and Session Laws 1991, c. 689, s. 182.

Session Laws 1983, c. 923, s. 52 had provided for the repeal of Chapter 150A, with the exception of G.S. 150A-9 and 150A-11 through 150A-17, effective July 1, 1985. Session Laws 1985, c. 504, s. 1 extended the date of the repeal to July 11, 1985, and Session Laws 1985, c. 684, s. 1 further extended the date of the repeal to July 14, 1985. Subsequently, Session Laws 1985, c. 746, s. 10, effective July 12, 1985, repealed the repealing language of Session Laws 1983, c. 923, s. 52. Thus, the repeal by Session Laws 1983, c. 923, s. 52 never went into effect.

Session Laws 1983, c. 883, s. 1, had provided for repeal, effective July 1, 1985, of all rules adopted under the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 150A which were in effect on January 1, 1985, unless they were approved by the 1985 Session of the General Assembly. Session Laws 1985, c. 504, s. 2 extended the repeal date provided for in Session Laws 1983, c. 883 to July 11, 1985, and Session Laws 1985, c. 684, s. 2, further extended this date to July 14, 1985. Subsequently, Session Laws 1985, c. 746, s. 11, effective July 12, 1985, repealed Session Laws 1983, c. 883, s. 1. Thus, the repeal of rules by Session Laws 1983, c. 883, s. 1 never went into effect.

Former G.S. 150A-10 was repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 641, s. 2, effective January 1, 1984. Former G.S. 150A-46.1, relating to review de novo, was enacted by Session Laws 1983, c. 919, s. 1.